California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 additional costs of the Department of Water Resources, equal to the customer’s proportionate share of the Department of Water Resources’ estimated net unavoidable electricity purchase contract costs as determined by the commission, for the period commencing with the customer’s purchases of electricity from the community choice aggregator, through the expiration of all then existing electricity purchase contracts entered into by the Department of Water Resources.

(f) A retail end-use customer purchasing electricity from a community choice aggregator pursuant to this section shall reimburse the electrical corporation that previously served the customer for all of the following:

(1) The electrical corporation’s unrecovered past undercollections for electricity purchases, including any financing costs, attributable to that customer, that the commission lawfully determines may be
 recovered in rates.

(2) Any additional costs of the electrical corporation recoverable in commission-approved rates, equal to the share of the electrical corporation’s estimated net unavoidable electricity purchase contract costs attributable to the customer, as determined by the commission, for the period commencing with the customer’s purchases of electricity from the community choice aggregator, through the expiration of all then existing electricity purchase contracts entered into by the electrical corporation.

(g) Estimated net unavoidable electricity costs paid by the customers of a community choice aggregator shall be reduced by the value of any benefits that remain with bundled service customers, unless the customers of the community choice aggregator are allocated a fair and equitable share of those benefits.

(h) (1) Any charges imposed pursuant to subdivision (e) shall be the property of the Department of Water Resources. Any charges imposed pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be the property of the electrical corporation. The commission shall establish mechanisms, including agreements with, or orders with respect to, electrical corporations necessary to ensure that charges payable pursuant to this section shall be promptly remitted to the party entitled to payment.

(2) Charges imposed pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be nonbypassable.

(i) The commission shall authorize community choice aggregation only if the commission imposes a cost-recovery mechanism pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (h). Except as provided by this subdivision, this section shall not alter the suspension by the commission of direct purchases of electricity
 from alternate providers other than by community choice aggregators, pursuant to Section 365.1.

(j) (1) The commission shall not authorize community choice aggregation until it implements a cost-recovery mechanism, consistent with subdivisions (d), (e), and (f), that is applicable to customers that elected to purchase electricity from an alternate provider between February 1, 2001, and January 1, 2003.

(2) The commission shall not authorize community choice aggregation until it has adopted rules for implementing community choice aggregation.

(k) (1) Except for nonbypassable charges imposed by the commission pursuant to subdivisions (d), (e), (f), and (h), and programs authorized by the commission to provide broader statewide or regional benefits to all customers, electric
 service customers of a community choice aggregator shall not be required to pay nonbypassable charges for goods, services, or programs that do not benefit either, or where applicable, both, the customer and the community choice aggregator serving the customer.

(2) The commission, the Energy Commission, an electrical corporation, or a third-party administrator shall administer any program funded through a nonbypassable charge on a nondiscriminatory basis so that the electric service customers of a community choice aggregator may participate in the program on an equal basis with the customers of an electrical corporation.

(3) This subdivision does not modify, or prohibit the use of, charges funding programs for the benefit of low-income customers.

(l) (1) An electrical corporation shall not
 terminate the services of a community choice aggregator unless authorized by a vote of the full commission. The commission shall ensure that before authorizing a termination of service, that the community choice aggregator has been provided adequate notice and a reasonable opportunity to be heard regarding any electrical corporation contentions in support of termination. If the contentions made by the electrical corporation in favor of termination include factual claims, the community choice aggregator shall be afforded an opportunity to address those claims in an evidentiary hearing.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if the Independent System Operator has transferred the community choice aggregator’s scheduling coordination responsibilities to the incumbent electrical corporation, an administrative law judge or assigned commissioner, after providing the aggregator with notice and an opportunity to respond, may suspend the aggregator’s service
 to customers pending a full vote of the commission.

(m) (1) The commission shall require each community choice aggregator with gross annual revenues exceeding fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to annually submit a detailed and verifiable plan to the commission for increasing procurement from small, local, and diverse business enterprises in all categories, including, but not limited to, renewable energy, energy storage system, and smart grid projects.

(2) (A) The commission shall require each community choice aggregator with gross annual revenues exceeding fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to annually submit a report to the commission regarding its procurement from women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises in all categories, including, but not limited to, renewable energy, energy storage system, and smart
 grid projects.

(B) The report shall be in a form that the commission may require and shall be submitted by an annual date that the commission shall designate.

(C) The report shall include women, minority, disabled veteran, and LGBT business enterprises with whom a prime contractor or grantee of a community choice aggregator has engaged in contracts or subcontracts for all categories, including, but not limited to, renewable energy, energy storage system, and smart grid projects.

(3) The Legislature declares that each community choice aggregator that is not required to submit a plan pursuant to this subdivision is encouraged to voluntarily adopt a plan for increasing procurement from small, local, and diverse business enterprises in all categories.

(n) Any meeting of an entity authorized to be a community choice aggregator, as defined in Section 331.1, for the purpose of developing, implementing, or administering a program of community choice aggregation shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(o) (1) As part of each annual report required pursuant to subdivision (m), each community choice aggregator shall provide all of the following information in the aggregate:

(A) The number of new contractors and subcontractors certified pursuant to General Order 156 with which it contracted.

(B) The total dollar amounts expended with in-state contractors certified under General Order 156.

(C) The total dollar amounts expended with in-state subcontractors certified under General Order 156.

(D) The percentage of the total workforce used by contractors and subcontractors that reside in California.

(E) Data regarding the diversity of contractor or subcontractor workforces, to the extent that the data is provided voluntarily by the employees of the contractor or subcontractor.

(2) A community choice aggregator may use data provided to the commission pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 8284 to satisfy the requirements of paragraph (1).

(p) For purposes of this section, “disabled veteran business enterprise,” “LGBT business enterprise,” “minority business enterprise,” “renewable
 energy project,” and “women business enterprise,” are defined as in Section 8282.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 784, Sec. 1.   (SB 1177)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

366.3.

Bundled retail customers of an electrical corporation shall not experience any cost increase as a result of the implementation of a community choice aggregator program. The commission shall also ensure that departing load does not experience any cost increases as a result of an allocation of costs that were not incurred on behalf of the departing load.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 547, Sec. 15.   (SB 350)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

366.5.

(a) No change in the aggregator or supplier of electric power for any small commercial customer may be made until one of the following means of confirming the change has been completed:

(1) Independent third-party telephone verification.

(2) Receipt of a written confirmation received in the mail from the consumer after the consumer has received an information package confirming the agreement.

(3) The customer signs a document fully explaining the nature and effect of the change in service.

(4) The customer’s consent is obtained through electronic means, including, but not limited to, computer transactions.

(b) No change in the aggregator or provider of electric power for any residential customer may be made over the telephone until the change has been confirmed by an independent third-party verification company, as follows:

(1) The third-party verification company shall meet each of the following criteria:

(A) Be independent from the entity that seeks to provide the new service.

(B) Not be directly or indirectly managed, controlled, or directed, or owned wholly or in part, by an entity that seeks to provide the new service or by any corporation, firm, or person who directly or indirectly manages, controls, or directs, or owns more than 5 percent of the entity.

(C) Operate from facilities physically separate from those of the entity that seeks to provide the new service.

(D) Not derive commission or compensation based upon the number of sales confirmed.

(2) The entity seeking to verify the sale shall do so by connecting the resident by telephone to the third-party verification company or by arranging for the third-party verification company to call the customer to confirm the sale.

(3) The third-party verification company shall obtain the customer’s oral confirmation regarding the change, and shall record that confirmation by obtaining appropriate verification data. The record shall be available to the customer upon request. Information obtained from the customer through confirmation shall not be used for marketing purposes. Any unauthorized release of this information is grounds for a civil suit by the aggrieved resident against the entity or its employees who are responsible for the violation.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1), (2), and (3), an aggregator or provider of electric power shall not be required to comply with these provisions when the customer directly calls an aggregator or provider of electric power to change service providers. However, an aggregator or provider of electric power shall not avoid the verification requirements by asking a customer to contact an aggregator or provider of electric power directly to make any change in the service provider.

(c) No change in the aggregator or provider of electric power for any residential customer may be made via an Internet transaction, in which the customer accesses the website of the aggregator or provider, unless both of the following occur with respect to confirming the change:

(1) In addition to any other information gathered in the course of the transaction, the customer shall be asked to read and respond to a separate screen that states, in easily legible text, the following:

“I acknowledge that in entering this transaction I am voluntarily choosing to change the entity that supplies me with my electric power.”

(2) The separate screen shall offer the customer the option to complete or terminate the transaction.

(d) (1) No change in the aggregator or provider of electric power for any residential customer may be made via a written transaction unless the change has been confirmed, as provided in this subdivision. In order to comply with this subdivision, in addition to any other information gathered in the course of the transaction, and in addition to any other signature required, the customer shall be asked to sign and date a document separate from that written transaction, containing the following words printed in 10-point type or larger:

“I acknowledge that in signing this contract or agreement, I am voluntarily choosing to change the entity that supplies me with electric power.”

(2) The acknowledgment document described in paragraph (1) may not be included with a check or in connection with a sweepstakes solicitation.

(e) Any aggregator or provider of electric power offering electricity service to residential and small commercial customers that switches the electric service of a customer without the customer’s consent shall be liable to the aggregator or provider of electric power offering electricity services previously selected by the customer in an amount equal to all charges paid by the customer after the violation and shall refund to the customer any amount in excess of the amount that the customer would have been obligated to pay had the customer not been switched.

(f) An aggregator or provider of electric power shall keep a record of the confirmation of a change pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) for two years from the date of that confirmation, and shall make those records available, upon request, to the customer and to the commission in the course of a commission investigation of a customer complaint or an investigation pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 394.2.

(g) Public agencies are exempt from this section to the extent they are serving customers within their jurisdiction.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (c) and (d), the commission may require third-party verification for all residential changes to electric service providers if it finds that the application of subdivisions (c) and (d) results in the unauthorized changing of a customer’s electric service provider.

(i) An electrical corporation is exempt from this section for customers that default to the service of the electrical corporation.

(j) Electric power sold to customers pursuant to Section 80100 of the Water Code is not subject to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 3.   Effective February 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

367.

The commission shall identify and determine those costs and categories of costs for generation-related assets and obligations, consisting of generation facilities, generation-related regulatory assets, nuclear settlements, and power purchase contracts, including, but not limited to, restructurings, renegotiations or terminations thereof approved by the commission, that were being collected in commission-approved rates on December 20, 1995, and that may become uneconomic as a result of a competitive generation market, in that these costs may not be recoverable in market prices in a competitive market, and appropriate costs incurred after December 20, 1995, for capital additions to generating facilities existing as of December 20, 1995, that the commission determines are reasonable and should be recovered, provided that these additions are necessary to maintain the facilities through December 31, 2001. These uneconomic costs shall include transition costs as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 840, and shall be recovered from all customers or in the case of fixed transition amounts, from the customers specified in subdivision (a) of Section 841, on a nonbypassable basis and shall:

(a) Be amortized over a reasonable time period, including collection on an accelerated basis, consistent with not increasing rates for any rate schedule, contract, or tariff option above the levels in effect on June 10, 1996; provided that, the recovery shall not extend beyond December 31, 2001, except as follows:

(1) Costs associated with employee-related transition costs as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 375 shall continue until fully collected; provided, however, that the cost collection shall not extend beyond December 31, 2006.

(2) Power purchase contract obligations shall continue for the duration of the contract. Costs associated with any buy-out, buy-down, or renegotiation of the contracts shall continue to be collected for the duration of any agreement governing the buy-out, buy-down, or renegotiated contract; provided, however, no power purchase contract shall be extended as a result of the buy-out, buy-down, or renegotiation.

(3) Costs associated with contracts approved by the commission to settle issues associated with the Biennial Resource Plan Update may be collected through March 31, 2002; provided that only 80 percent of the balance of the costs remaining after December 31, 2001, shall be eligible for recovery.

(4) Nuclear incremental cost incentive plans for the San Onofre nuclear generating station shall continue for the full term as authorized by the commission in Decision 96-01-011 and Decision 96-04-059; provided that the recovery shall not extend beyond December 31, 2003.

(5) Costs associated with the exemptions provided in subdivision (a) of Section 374 may be collected through March 31, 2002, provided that only fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) of the balance of the costs remaining after December 31, 2001, shall be eligible for recovery.

(6) Fixed transition amounts, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 840, may be recovered from the customers specified in subdivision (a) of Section 841 until all rate reduction bonds associated with the fixed transition amounts have been paid in full by the financing entity.

(b) Be based on a calculation mechanism that nets the negative value of all above market utility-owned generation-related assets against the positive value of all below market utility-owned generation related assets. For those assets subject to valuation, the valuations used for the calculation of the uneconomic portion of the net book value shall be determined not later than December 31, 2001, and shall be based on appraisal, sale, or other divestiture. The commission’s determination of the costs eligible for recovery and of the valuation of those assets at the time the assets are exposed to market risk or retired, in a proceeding under Section 455.5, 851, or otherwise, shall be final, and notwithstanding Section 1708 or any other provision of law, may not be rescinded, altered or amended.

(c) Be limited in the case of utility-owned fossil generation to the uneconomic portion of the net book value of the fossil capital investment existing as of January 1, 1998, and appropriate costs incurred after December 20, 1995, for capital additions to generating facilities existing as of December 20, 1995, that the commission determines are reasonable and should be recovered, provided that the additions are necessary to maintain the facilities through December 31, 2001. All “going forward costs” of fossil plant operation, including operation and maintenance, administrative and general, fuel and fuel transportation costs, shall be recovered solely from independent Power Exchange revenues or from contracts with the Independent System Operator, provided that for the purposes of this chapter, the following costs may be recoverable pursuant to this section:

(1) Commission-approved operating costs for particular utility-owned fossil powerplants or units, at particular times when reactive power/voltage support is not yet procurable at market-based rates in locations where it is deemed needed for the reactive power/voltage support by the Independent System Operator, provided that the units are otherwise authorized to recover market-based rates and provided further that for an electrical corporation that is also a gas corporation and that serves at least four million customers as of December 20, 1995, the commission shall allow the electrical corporation to retain any earnings from operations of the reactive power/voltage support plants or units and shall not require the utility to apply any portions to offset recovery of transition costs. Cost recovery under the cost recovery mechanism shall end on December 31, 2001.

(2) An electrical corporation that, as of December 20, 1995, served at least four million customers, and that was also a gas corporation that served less than four thousand customers, may recover, pursuant to this section, 100 percent of the uneconomic portion of the fixed costs paid under fuel and fuel transportation contracts that were executed prior to December 20, 1995, and were subsequently determined to be reasonable by the commission, or 100 percent of the buy-down or buy-out costs associated with the contracts to the extent the costs are determined to be reasonable by the commission.

(d) Be adjusted throughout the period through March 31, 2002, to track accrual and recovery of costs provided for in this subdivision. Recovery of costs prior to December 31, 2001, shall include a return as provided for in Decision 95-12-063, as modified by Decision 96-01-009, together with associated taxes.

(e) (1) Be allocated among the various classes of customers, rate schedules, and tariff options to ensure that costs are recovered from these classes, rate schedules, contract rates, and tariff options, including self-generation deferral, interruptible, and standby rate options in substantially the same proportion as similar costs are recovered as of June 10, 1996, through the regulated retail rates of the relevant electric utility, provided that there shall be a firewall segregating the recovery of the costs of competition transition charge exemptions such that the costs of competition transition charge exemptions granted to members of the combined class of residential and small commercial customers shall be recovered only from these customers, and the costs of competition transition charge exemptions granted to members of the combined class of customers, other than residential and small commercial customers, shall be recovered only from these customers.

(2) Individual customers shall not experience rate increases as a result of the allocation of transition costs. However, customers who elect to purchase energy from suppliers other than the Power Exchange through a direct transaction, may incur increases in the total price they pay for electricity to the extent the price for the energy exceeds the Power Exchange price.

(3) The commission shall retain existing cost allocation authority, provided the firewall and rate freeze principles are not violated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 275, Sec. 7.   Effective August 15, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

367.7.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to ensure that individual customers do not experience rate increases as a result of the allocation of transition costs, in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 367.

(b) The commission shall implement a methodology whereby the Power Exchange energy credit for a customer with a meter installed on or after June 30, 2000, that is capable of recording hourly data is calculated based on the actual hourly data for that customer. The Power Exchange energy credit for a customer with a meter installed before June 30, 2000, that is capable of recording hourly data shall, at the election of the customer, on a one-time basis before June 30, 2000, be calculated based on either (1) the actual hourly data for that customer or (2) the average load profile for that customer class. If the customer fails to make an election, that customer’s Power Exchange energy credit shall continue to be based on the average load profile for that customer class.

(c) Additional incremental billing costs incurred as a result of the methodology implemented by the commission pursuant to subdivision (b) may be recoverable through rates for that customer class, if the commission finds that the costs are reasonable.

(d) The methodology implemented by the commission pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) shall not result in any shifts in cost between customer classes and shall be consistent with the firewall provision set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 367.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 408, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

368.

Each electrical corporation shall propose a cost recovery plan to the commission for the recovery of the uneconomic costs of an electrical corporation’s generation-related assets and obligations identified in Section 367. The commission shall authorize the electrical corporation to recover the costs pursuant to the plan if the plan meets the following criteria:

(a) The cost recovery plan shall set rates for each customer class, rate schedule, contract, or tariff option, at levels equal to the level as shown on electric rate schedules as of June 10, 1996, provided that rates for residential and small commercial customers shall be reduced so that these customers shall receive rate reductions of no less than 10 percent for 1998 continuing through 2002. These rate levels for each customer class, rate schedule, contract, or tariff option shall remain in effect until the earlier of March 31, 2002, or the date on which the commission-authorized costs for utility generation-related assets and obligations have been fully recovered. The electrical corporation shall be at risk for those costs not recovered during that time period. Each utility shall amortize its total uneconomic costs, to the extent possible, such that for each year during the transition period its recorded rate of return on the remaining uneconomic assets does not exceed its authorized rate of return for those assets. For purposes of determining the extent to which the costs have been recovered, any over-collections recorded in Energy Costs Adjustment Clause and Electric Revenue Adjustment Mechanism balancing accounts, as of December 31, 1996, shall be credited to the recovery of the costs.

(b) The cost recovery plan shall provide for identification and separation of individual rate components such as charges for energy, transmission, distribution, public benefit programs, and recovery of uneconomic costs. The separation of rate components required by this subdivision shall be used to ensure that customers of the electrical corporation who become eligible to purchase electricity from suppliers other than the electrical corporation pay the same unbundled component charges, other than energy, that a bundled service customer pays. No cost shifting among customer classes, rate schedules, contract, or tariff options shall result from the separation required by this subdivision. Nothing in this provision is intended to affect the rates, terms, and conditions or to limit the use of any Federal Energy Regulatory Commission-approved contract entered into by the electrical corporation prior to the effective date of this provision.

(c) In consideration of the risk that the uneconomic costs identified in Section 367 may not be recoverable within the period identified in subdivision (a) of Section 367, an electrical corporation that, as of December 20, 1995, served more than four million customers, and was also a gas corporation that served less than four thousand customers, shall have the flexibility to employ risk management tools, such as forward hedges, to manage the market price volatility associated with unexpected fluctuations in natural gas prices, and the out-of-pocket costs of acquiring the risk management tools shall be considered reasonable and collectible within the transition freeze period. This subdivision applies only to the transaction costs associated with the risk management tools and shall not include any losses from changes in market prices.

(d) In order to ensure implementation of the cost recovery plan, the limitation on the maximum amount of cost recovery for nuclear facilities that may be collected in any year adopted by the commission in Decision 96-01-011 and Decision 96-04-059 shall be eliminated to allow the maximum opportunity to collect the nuclear costs within the transition cap period.

(e) As to an electrical corporation that is also a gas corporation serving more than four million California customers, so long as any cost recovery plan adopted in accordance with this section satisfies subdivision (a), it shall also provide for annual increases in base revenues, effective January 1, 1997, and January 1, 1998, equal to the inflation rate for the prior year plus two percentage points, as measured by the consumer price index. The increase shall do both of the following:

(1) Remain in effect pending the next general rate case review, which shall be filed not later than December 31, 1997, for rates that would become effective in January 1999. For purposes of any commission-approved performance-based ratemaking mechanism or general rate case review, the increases in base revenue authorized by this subdivision shall create no presumption that the level of base revenue reflecting those increases constitute the appropriate starting point for subsequent revenues.

(2) Be used by the utility for the purposes of enhancing its transmission and distribution system safety and reliability, including, but not limited to, vegetation management and emergency response. To the extent the revenues are not expended for system safety and reliability, they shall be credited against subsequent safety and reliability base revenue requirements. Any excess revenues carried over shall not be used to pay any monetary sanctions imposed by the commission.

(f) The cost recovery plan shall provide the electrical corporation with the flexibility to manage the renegotiation, buy-out, or buy-down of the electrical corporation’s power purchase obligations, consistent with review by the commission to assure that the terms provide net benefits to ratepayers and are otherwise reasonable in protecting the interests of both ratepayers and shareholders.

(g) An example of a plan authorized by this section is the document entitled “Restructuring Rate Settlement” transmitted to the commission by Pacific Gas and Electric Company on June 12, 1996.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 125.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

368.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon the termination of the 10-percent rate reduction for residential and small commercial customers set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 368, the commission may not subject those residential and small commercial customers to any rate increases or future rate obligations solely as a result of the termination of the 10-percent rate reduction.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) do not affect the authority of the commission to raise rates for reasons other than the termination of the 10-percent rate reduction set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 368.

(c) Nothing in this section shall further extend the authority to impose fixed transition amounts, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 840, or further authorize or extend rate reduction bonds, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 840.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 7, Sec. 2.   Effective August 8, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

369.

The commission shall establish an effective mechanism that ensures recovery of transition costs referred to in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376, and subject to the conditions in Sections 371 to 374, inclusive, from all existing and future consumers in the service territory in which the utility provided electricity services as of December 20, 1995; provided, that the costs shall not be recoverable for new customer load or incremental load of an existing customer where the load is being met through a direct transaction and the transaction does not otherwise require the use of transmission or distribution facilities owned by the utility. However, the obligation to pay the competition transition charges cannot be avoided by the formation of a local publicly owned electrical corporation on or after December 20, 1995, or by annexation of any portion of an electrical corporation’s service area by an existing local publicly owned electric utility.

This section shall not apply to service taken under tariffs, contracts, or rate schedules that are on file, accepted, or approved by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, unless otherwise authorized by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

369.5.

(a) On or before December 31, 2026, the commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, shall develop a framework for assessing, tracking, and analyzing total annual energy costs paid by residential households in California. The framework shall include all of the following:

(1) A methodology for identifying, categorizing, and quantifying major residential household energy sources.

(2) The total annual energy costs borne by residential households.

(3) Annual costs for major residential household energy sources, including, but not limited to, electricity, natural gas, propane, gasoline, and diesel.

(4) Changes in the total annual energy costs for residential households over time.

(5) The relative contributions of different energy sources to the total annual energy costs borne by residential households.

(6) The annual growth rate of energy costs for residential households by energy source.

(7) Projections of possible future total energy costs for residential households for the next 10 years.

(8) Scenarios of actions that may lead to a 5 percent, 10 percent, and 15 percent reduction in total annual energy costs paid by residential households in 2035, relative to 2024 total annual energy costs after adjusting for inflation.

(9) An assessment of the actions identified pursuant to paragraph (8) and the effects they may have on public health and safety, electrical and gas system reliability, and the achievement of the state’s 2045 clean electricity goal developed pursuant to Section 454.53 and the state’s 2045 carbon neutrality goal developed pursuant to Section 38562.2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The commission may use the total annual energy cost framework pursuant to subdivision (a) for purposes of evaluating any request by an electrical corporation and gas corporation to track new spending eligible for recovery or to adjust a revenue requirement. In evaluating any such request, the commission shall consider whether the electrical corporation and gas corporation should take additional actions to achieve the reductions in total annual energy costs identified in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) On or before December 31, 2026, the commission shall submit a report to the Legislature containing the framework and the information in subdivision (a).

(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this subdivision shall become inoperative on December 31, 2030.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 762, Sec. 2.   (AB 3264)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Inoperative December 31, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

370.

The commission shall require, as a prerequisite for any consumer in California to engage in direct transactions permitted in Section 365, that beginning with the commencement of these direct transactions, the consumer shall have an obligation to pay the costs provided in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376, and subject to the conditions in Sections 371 to 374, inclusive, directly to the electrical corporation providing electricity service in the area in which the consumer is located. This obligation shall be set forth in the applicable rate schedule, contract, or tariff option under which the customer is receiving service from the electrical corporation. To the extent the consumer does not use the electrical corporation’s facilities for direct transaction, the obligation to pay shall be confirmed in writing, and the customer shall be advised by any electricity marketer engaged in the transaction of the requirement that the customer execute a confirmation. The requirement for marketers to inform customers of the written requirement shall cease on January 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 854, Sec. 10.   Effective September 24, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

371.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 372 and 374, the uneconomic costs provided in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376 shall be applied to each customer based on the amount of electricity purchased by the customer from an electrical corporation or alternate supplier of electricity, subject to changes in usage occurring in the normal course of business.

(b) Changes in usage occurring in the normal course of business are those resulting from changes in business cycles, termination of operations, departure from the utility service territory, weather, reduced production, modifications to production equipment or operations, changes in production or manufacturing processes, fuel switching, including installation of fuel cells pending a contrary determination by the Energy
 Commission, enhancement or increased efficiency of equipment or performance of existing self-cogeneration equipment, replacement of existing cogeneration equipment with new power generation equipment of similar size as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 372, installation of demand-side management equipment or facilities, energy conservation efforts, or other similar factors.

(c) This section does not exempt or alter the obligation of a customer to comply with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 119075) of Part 15 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code. This section does not limit the ability of residential customers to alter their pattern of electricity purchases by activities on the customer side of the meter.

(d) Enhancement or increased efficiency of equipment, as described in subdivision (b), shall include industrial process heat recovery technology
 that meets the requirements of Section 451.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 700, Sec. 2.   (AB 2109)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

372.

(a) It is the policy of the state to encourage and support the development of cogeneration as an efficient, environmentally beneficial, competitive energy resource that will enhance the reliability of local generation supply, and promote local business growth. Subject to the specific conditions provided in this section, the commission shall determine the applicability to customers of uneconomic costs as specified in Sections 367, 368, 375, and 376. Consistent with this state policy, the commission shall provide that these costs shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) To load served onsite or under an over-the-fence arrangement by a nonmobile self-cogeneration or cogeneration facility that was operational on or before